Washington statutes.
RCW 10.91.010

Arrest and return of released person charged in another state—Violation of release conditions—Request—Documents—Warrant—Investigation.

(1) If a person who has been charged with crime in another state and released from custody prior to final judgment, including the final disposition of any appeal, is alleged to have violated the terms and conditions of his or her release, and is present in this state, a designated agent of the court, judge, or magistrate which authorized the release may request the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the person and an order authorizing his or her return to the demanding court, judge, or magistrate. Before the warrant is issued, the designated agent must file with a judicial officer of this state the following documents:

(a) An affidavit stating the name and whereabouts of the person whose removal is sought, the crime with which the person was charged, the time and place of the crime charged, and the status of the proceedings against him or her;

(b) A certified copy of the order or other document specifying the terms and conditions under which the person was released from custody; and

(c) A certified copy of an order of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate stating the manner in which the terms and the conditions of the release have been violated and designating the affiant its agent for seeking removal of the person.

(2) Upon initially determining that the affiant is a designated agent of the demanding court, judge, or magistrate, and that there is a probable cause for believing that the person whose removal is sought has violated the terms or conditions of his or her release, the judicial officer shall issue a warrant to a law enforcement officer of this state for the person's arrest.

(3) The judicial officer shall notify the prosecuting attorney of his or her action and shall direct him or her to investigate the case to ascertain the validity of the affidavits and documents required by subsection (1) of this section and the identity and authority of the affiant.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1089; 1971 ex.s. c 17 s 2.]